Washington statutes.
RCW 31.20.060

Members power to loan funds to corporation.

Any member, as set forth in RCW 31.20.070, shall have power and authority to loan any of their funds to any development credit corporation of which they are a member, subject to the restrictions as set forth in RCW 31.20.080, notwithstanding any laws to the contrary pertaining to such member.

[ 1959 c 213 s 6.]